Utah statutes.
70A-2-720.   Effect of "cancellation" or "rescission" on claims for
antecedent breach.
Unless the contrary intention clearly appears, expressions of "cancellation"
or "rescission" of the contract or the like shall not be construed as a
renunciation or discharge of any claim in damages for an antecedent breach.
